Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 751. OFFICE OF STATE-FEDERAL RELATIONS

Sec. 751.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the Office of State-Federal Relations Advisory Policy Board.

(2) "Director" means the director of the Office of State-Federal Relations.

(3) "Office" means the Office of State-Federal Relations.

(4) "State agency" means a state board, commission, department, institution, or officer having statewide jurisdiction, including a state college or university.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991.

Sec. 751.002. OFFICE OF STATE-FEDERAL RELATIONS. (a) The Office of State-Federal Relations is an agency of the state and operates within the executive department. The office is administratively attached to the office of the governor. The governor's office shall provide human resources and other administrative support for the office. The office is funded by appropriations made to the office of the governor.

(b) The office is subject to the administrative procedure law, Chapter 2001.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 751.003. SUNSET PROVISION. The Office of State-Federal Relations is subject to Chapter 325 (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the office is abolished September 1, 2035.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 17, Sec. 2.24, eff. Nov. 12, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 928 (H.B. 3249), Sec. 2.08(a), eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1232 (S.B. 652), Sec. 5.05, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 850 (S.B. 713), Sec. 1.02, eff. June 16, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 225 (H.B. 1550), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 751.004. APPOINTMENT AND TERM OF DIRECTOR. (a) The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a director of the office.

(b) The director serves at the pleasure of the governor.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991.

Sec. 751.005. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF OFFICE. (a) The office shall exercise the powers and carry out the duties prescribed by this section in order to act as a liaison from the state to the federal government.

(b) The office shall:

(1) help coordinate state and federal programs dealing with the same subject;

(2) inform the governor and the legislature of federal programs that may be carried out in the state or that affect state programs;

(3) provide federal agencies and the United States Congress with information about state policy and state conditions on matters that concern the federal government;

(4) provide the legislature with information useful in measuring the effect of federal actions on the state and local programs;

(5) prepare and supply to the governor and all members of the legislature an annual report that:

(A) describes the office's operations;

(B) contains the office's priorities and strategies for the following year;

(C) details projects and legislation pursued by the office; and

(D) discusses issues in the following congressional session of interest to this state;

(6) notify the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the legislative standing committees in each house with primary jurisdiction over intergovernmental affairs of federal activities relevant to the state and inform the Texas congressional delegation of state activities;

(7) conduct frequent conference calls with the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives or their designees regarding state-federal relations and programs;

(8) respond to requests for information from the legislature, the United States Congress, and federal agencies;

(9) coordinate with the Legislative Budget Board regarding the effects of federal funding on the state budget; and

(10) report to, and on request send appropriate representatives to appear before, the legislative standing committees in each house with primary jurisdiction over intergovernmental affairs.

(c) The office may maintain office space at locations inside and outside the state as chosen by the office.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(63), eff. June 17, 2011.

(e) The report required under Subsection (b)(5) must include an evaluation of the performance of the office based on performance measures that are developed by the board.

(f) The office shall post the report required under Subsection (b)(5) to the office's publicly accessible Internet website.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 11, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(63), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 225 (H.B. 1550), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 751.006. STAFF; PERSONNEL POLICIES. (a) The director may employ staff necessary to carry out the director's powers and duties under this chapter. The director or the director's designee shall provide to office employees, as often as necessary, information regarding their qualification for employment under this chapter and their responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state employees.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214, Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214, Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214, Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214, Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214, Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

(g) The director and the staff of the office working in Washington, D.C., may receive a cost-of-living salary adjustment.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 7(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 751.007. LOBBYIST RESTRICTION. A person required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305 may not act as general counsel of the office.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991.

Sec. 751.008. PUBLIC INFORMATION AND COMPLAINTS. (a) The director shall:

(1) prepare information of public interest describing the functions of the office and the procedures by which complaints are filed with and resolved by the office and make the information available to the public and appropriate state agencies; and

(2) establish methods by which consumers and service recipients are notified of the name, mailing address, and a telephone number of the office for the purpose of directing complaints to the office.

(b) The office shall keep information about each complaint filed with the office. The information shall include:

(1) the date the complaint is received;

(2) the name of the complainant;

(3) the subject matter of the complaint;

(4) a record of all persons contacted in relation to the complaint;

(5) a summary of the results of the review or investigation of the complaint; and

(6) for complaints for which the office took no action, an explanation of the reason the complaint was closed without action.

(c) The office shall keep a file about each written complaint filed with the office that the office has authority to resolve. The office shall provide to the person filing the complaint and the persons or entities complained about the office's policies and procedures pertaining to complaint investigation and resolution. The office, at least quarterly and until final disposition of the complaint, shall notify the person filing the complaint and the persons or entities complained about of the status of the complaint unless the notice would jeopardize an undercover investigation.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 751.009. CONTRIBUTIONS. (a) The office may accept contributions that the office determines will further the objectives of the office.

(b) A contribution may not be used to pay any part of the compensation of a person who is an officer or employee of the office on the date the office receives the contribution.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991.

Sec. 751.010. OFFICE OF STATE-FEDERAL RELATIONS ADVISORY POLICY BOARD. (a) The Office of State-Federal Relations Advisory Policy Board consists of:

(1) the governor;

(2) the lieutenant governor; and

(3) the speaker of the house of representatives.

(b) A member of the board may designate a person to perform the member's duties on the board.

(c) The board, by majority vote, shall select a presiding officer of the board.

(d) A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum to transact business.

(e) The board shall meet before the beginning of each congressional session and at the call of the presiding officer.

(f) The board shall work with the director to hold periodic meetings in the city of Austin at times determined by the presiding officer to discuss upcoming federal activities and issues with state agency representatives.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 751.011. BOARD DUTIES. The board shall review the office's priorities and strategies set forth in the annual report and deliver to the director any suggested modifications.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 751.012. INTERAGENCY CONTRACTS. (a) The office may enter into interagency contracts with other state agencies to locate staff of the other state agency in Washington, D.C., to work under the supervision of the director and shall coordinate activities conducted on behalf of the other agency with those of the office.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214, Sec. 7(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

(c) A contract under this section must include provisions under which staff of the other state agency:

(1) report directly to that agency's administrative head or the presiding officer of that agency's governing body;

(2) have an officially recognized role in that agency's budget planning process; and

(3) provide periodic updates of activities at meetings of that agency's governing body.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 75(1).

(e) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214, Sec. 7(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214, Sec. 7(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 4, Sec. 8.01, eff. Aug. 22, 1991. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 306, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 22, 75(1), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 7(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 751.015. CONTRACTS BETWEEN OFFICE AND CONSULTANTS. (a) If the office elects to contract with federal-level government relations consultants, the office shall adopt written procedures for those contracts. The procedures must include:

(1) guidelines regarding contract management;

(2) a competitive procurement process and method to assess the effectiveness of a prospective consultant;

(3) a technique for assigning a value to a prospective consultant's ability to provide services at a reasonable price and level of experience;

(4) a process for determining a prospective consultant's ability to work with influential members of the United States Congress and serve as an effective advocate on behalf of the state; and

(5) a method to verify that the interests of a prospective consultant or the consultant's other clients do not create a conflict of interest that may jeopardize the state's interest.

(b) A contract between the office and a federal-level government relations consultant must include:

(1) an agreement regarding the goals of the service to be provided by the consultant and targeted performance measures;

(2) a provision governing the manner in which the contract may be terminated by the parties to the contract; and

(3) a provision allowing the office, the state auditor's office as provided by Section 2262.003, and other specified oversight entities to audit the contractor's performance under the contract.

(c) All three members of the board must sign any contract between the office and a federal-level government relations consultant.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 751.016. CONTRACTS BY STATE AGENCIES OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. (a) In this section, "political subdivision" includes a river authority.

(b) An agency or political subdivision of the state shall report to the office on any contract between the agency or subdivision and a federal-level government relations consultant. A state agency or political subdivision shall submit one report under this section not later than the 30th day after the date the contract is executed and a second report not later than the 30th day after the date the contract is terminated. The report must include:

(1) the name of the consultant or consulting firm;

(2) the issue on which the consultant was hired to consult; and

(3) the amount of compensation paid or to be paid to the consultant under the contract.

(c) If a state agency contracts with a federal-level government relations consultant and the consultant subcontracts the work to another firm or individual, the state agency shall report the subcontract to the office.

(d) This section does not apply to a political subdivision whose federal-level government relations consultant is required by other law to disclose, report, and make available the information required by Subsection (b) to:

(1) the public; and

(2) a federal or state entity.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1214 (S.B. 1003), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009.